Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 6
TELECOMMUNICATIONS RESEARCH FACILITIES OF THE UNITED STATES

30-11-601. Short title.

This part 6 shall be known and may be cited as the "Telecommunications Research Facilities of the United States Protection Act of 1969".

Source:

L. 69:

p. 235, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-26-1.

30-11-602. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that it is the purpose of this part 6 to assist in promoting and protecting telecommunications research facilities of the United States which are located within the state of Colorado.

Specifically, it is the purpose of this part 6 to:

Avoid undue interferences caused by emanation of electrical impulses from electrical equipment functioning in the area surrounding telecommunications research facilities of the United States;

Promote the public interest by encouraging economic improvement and development of this state, and further, to promote educational and scientific research within this state;

Encourage the continued operational capability of telecommunications research facilities of the United States in areas of this state, which, in turn, will encourage and contribute to the economic improvement and development of the state and will promote educational and scientific research within this state.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 235, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-26-2.

30-11-603. Definitions.

As used in this part 6, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Expressways" or "major arterials" means those rights-of-way used primarily for fast or heavy traffic; and "collector streets" means those rights-of-way which have four lanes or more of moving traffic which carry traffic from local streets to the system of major arterials and highways and move traffic to parks, schools, and shopping centers serving residential neighborhoods.

"Governing body" means a city council, a board of trustees of a town, or a board of county commissioners.

"Planning commission" means the regional planning commission, county planning commission, district planning commission, or zoning commission, as the case may be, which has the responsibility of preparing plans for zoning or the making or adopting of plans for the physical development of the unincorporated and incorporated territory located within a distance of two miles from the perimeter of any telecommunications research facility of the United States.

"Telecommunications research facility of the United States" means a site presently owned by the United States in this state consisting of not less than fifteen hundred contiguous acres in area and having located thereon technical electronic facilities of a value of more than five million dollars operated by an agency of the United States, and which technical electronic facilities are principally utilized in a program of scientific research in telecommunications and related atmospheric science, involving highly sensitive reception, observation, measurement, and recording of radio waves from distant emanation of experimental signals, radio astronomical sources, or electromagnetic phenomena of the atmosphere or ionosphere.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 236, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-26-3.

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see § 30-26-301 (2)(d).

30-11-604. Scope of part 6.

Nothing in this part 6 shall be construed to change any zoning or restrict or limit any land use in effect on and after April 23, 1969, within a city, town, or a county in which a telecommunications research facility of the United States is wholly or partially located.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 236, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-26-4.

30-11-605. Powers and duties of governing bodies, planning commissions, and boards of adjustment.

Upon being requested to do so by an agency of the United States, the governing body shall determine if any telecommunications research facility of the United States is located wholly or partially within its jurisdiction. If such determination results in a finding that such a facility is so located, the planning commission, the board of adjustment, and the governing body shall, from and after April 23, 1969, be bound by the following: When considering any request for rezoning, exceptions to or variances from the terms of zoning regulations, or changed or additional uses of land within a distance of two miles from the perimeter of any telecommunications research facility of the United States, the planning commission, the board of adjustment, and the governing body shall consider, in a like manner as those criteria set forth in sections 30-28-115 and 31-23-303, C.R.S., and other criteria applied to the consideration of requests for rezoning, exceptions to or variances from zoning regulations, or changed or additional uses of land, any data presented as to the effect that development made pursuant to such request will have on such telecommunications research facility of the United States, including what interference may be caused to said facility by the emanation of electrical impulses from electrical equipment that may be installed if such request is approved.

If approval for any request for rezoning to a zoning district, for an exception to or variance from the terms of any zoning regulation, or for a changed or additional use of land, which will permit hospitals, industrial, business, or commercial uses is sought within a distance of two miles from the perimeter of any telecommunications research facility of the United States, the planning commission, the board of adjustment, and the governing body may request reasonable information regarding the proposed use to be made from the applicant submitting the request for approval, including, but not limited to, a summary of the kinds of industrial electrical equipment expected to be installed on such property if the approval being sought is given.

Within a distance of two miles from the perimeter of any telecommunications research facility of the United States, any approval of a subdivision plat in a residential zoning district and any approval for rezoning from existing districts to other districts that may exist or be created by the zoning resolution of any city, town, or county in which a telecommunications research facility of the United States is located shall be granted only if the covenants set forth in paragraphs (a) to (e) of subsection (4) of this section are included in the subdivision plat or as part of the rezoning request, which covenants shall be filed for recording with the county clerk and recorder following approval by the governing body; but said governing body may, under reasonable circumstances, waive the application of any one or more of said covenants with respect to all or any part of the affected land. The requirements set forth in this subsection (3) shall not apply to the approval of subdivision plats in single-family residential zoning districts where the minimum lot area permitted is one acre or more if the subdivision plat is approved, to requests for rezoning to single-family residential zoning districts in which the minimum lot area on unsubdivided land will be one acre or more if the rezoning request is approved, or to requests for rezoning to forestry or agricultural districts.

The covenants referred to in subsection (3) of this section are as follows:

All electrical distribution lines and service lines and all telephone lines shall be placed underground.

No neon signs of any kind shall be permitted on any part of the property.

No electrical fences shall be erected on any part of the property.

All street lights shall be shielded so as to minimize upward illumination.

No arc welding equipment or remote control garage door openers which employ a radiating type of receiver shall be installed or operated from a permanent location on the property.

No expressways or major arterials shall be authorized or constructed within a distance of one mile from the perimeter of any telecommunications research facility of the United States and, unless the governing body specifically makes an exception therefor, no collector streets shall be authorized or constructed within a distance of one mile from the perimeter of any telecommunications research facility of the United States.

The limitations of this part 6 shall be incorporated in any zoning resolution, building code resolution, or both, in any city, town, or county in which a telecommunications research facility of the United States is located, and each such city, town, or county shall enforce the same as provided by law.

The governing body shall determine, with the assistance of a surveyor, if necessary, the boundaries of lands located in such city, town, or county, or both, as the case may be, affected by the limitations imposed by this part 6 and shall record such boundaries in the office of the county clerk and recorder of said county.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 236, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-26-5.

L. 75:

(1) amended, p. 1271, § 9, effective May 1.